Utah statutes.
53A-22-102.   New industrial plants in school district -- Duty of school district.

A school district confronted with actual or anticipated large increases in enrollment because of the construction of a new industrial plant or plants to a degree that new buildings or additions to existing buildings are required shall make the following efforts to raise funds to meet those building needs:

(1)  bond to its maximum capacity and maintain maximum bonding by rebonding at least once every other year until building needs are met;

(2)  maintain an annual property tax levy for capital outlay and debt service combined of not less than .0036 per dollar of taxable value; and

(3)  initiate any action necessary to qualify for any state, federal, or other funds for capital outlay for which the district may be eligible.

